Maryland, session 2026, HB0057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND CIVIC
EXCELLENCE PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND CIVIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT THAT RECOGNIZES THE CIVIC READINESS AND CIVIC ENGAGEMENT
OF PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS IN THE STATE.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO RECOGNIZE STUDENTS
AND PUBLIC SCHOOLS THAT PROMOTE THE CIVIC READINESS AND CIVIC
ENGAGEMENT OF STUDENTS IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE STATE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(D) (C) (1) NOT LATER THAN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE
DEPARTMENT STATE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH EXPERTS AND
STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL DEVELOP GUIDELINES TO ASSIST PARTICIPATING LOCAL
– 1 –

Ch. 676 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SCHOOL SYSTEMS TO DETERMINE STUDENT PROFICIENCY IN CIVICS AND CIVIC
LITERACY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH THE CRITERIA AND REQUIREMENTS
FOR AWARDING A SEAL OF CIVIC EXCELLENCE TO A QUALIFIED STUDENT WHO
ATTENDS A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN A PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(2) THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE BOARD SHALL
INCLUDE A REQUIREMENT THAT, IN ORDER TO RECEIVE A SEAL OF CIVIC
EXCELLENCE, A STUDENT MUST COMPLETE A CAPSTONE PROJECT THROUGH AN
EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY THAT IS FOCUSED ON CIVIC SERVICE IN STATE,
COUNTY, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(E) (D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A A LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM THAT PARTICIPATES MAY CHOOSE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
(2) A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN A PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM SHALL UTILIZE THE GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION TO ESTABLISH:
(I) A MARYLAND CIVIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM IN SCHOOLS;
(II) APPLICATION CRITERIA TO ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM;
AND
(III) CRITERIA FOR AWARDING A STUDENT THE SEAL OF CIVIC
EXCELLENCE MAY NOT OPT OUT OF PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM.
(3) IF A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM CHOOSES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM, A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL SHALL IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE STATE BOARD, BY
INCORPORATING A CIVIC SERVICE CAPSTONE PROJECT INTO AN EXTRACURRICULAR
ACTIVITY AT THE SCHOOL THAT:
(I) IS AN EXISTING EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY AT THE TIME
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM CHOOSES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM; OR
(II) IS A NEW EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY THAT IS
SUPERVISED BY A PAID STAFF MEMBER.
(F) (E) A PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM THAT DETERMINES A
PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT HAS FULFILLED THE CRITERIA UNDER THE
PROGRAM MAY ESTABLISHED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 676
(1) AWARD THE STUDENT A SEAL OF CIVIC EXCELLENCE; AND
(2) RECOGNIZE THE AWARD BY AWARDING A CORD OR MEDAL OR BY
ATTACHING OTHER INSIGNIA ON THE STUDENT’S HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA.
(G) (F) A PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY COLLABORATE
WITH NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS, CIVIC ORGANIZATIONS, OR INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION TO SUPPORT THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(H) (G) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT
A REPORT ON THE PROGRAM BASED ON THE MOST RECENTLY COMPLETED SCHOOL
YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –